Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.875

Retirement eligibility.

(1) NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five and who has:

(a) Completed ten service credit years; or

(b) Completed five service credit years, including twelve service credit months after attaining age forty-four; or

(c) Completed five service credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817;

shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840.

(2) EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has completed at least ten years of service shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(3) ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT.

(a) Any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(b)(i) On or after September 1, 2008, any member who has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced as follows:

Retirement

Age

Percent

Reduction

55

20%

56

17%

57

14%

58

11%

59

8%

60

5%

61

2%

62

0%

63

0%

64

0%

(ii) Any member who retired on or after September 1, 2008, and chose the three percent per year reduction provided under (a) of this subsection shall have a retirement allowance recalculated under the reductions of (b)(i) of this subsection for benefit payments made on or after January 1, 2024.

(c) Members who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after May 1, 2013, are not eligible for the alternate early retirement provisions of (a) or (b) of this subsection. Any member who first becomes employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after May 1, 2013, and has completed at least thirty service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by five percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

[ 2023 c 410 s 5; 2012 1st sp.s. c 7 s 2; 2007 c 491 s 4; 2006 c 33 s 1; 2000 c 247 s 903; 1996 c 39 s 6; 1995 c 239 s 113.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2023 c 410: See notes following RCW 41.32.765.

Benefits not contractual right until September 1, 2008—2007 c 491: See note following RCW 41.32.765.

Severability—Conflict with federal requirements—2007 c 491: See notes following RCW 41.32.765.

Effective dates—Subchapter headings not law—2000 c 247: See RCW 41.40.931 and 41.40.932.

Effective dates—1996 c 39: See note following RCW 41.32.010.

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.

Benefits not contractual right until date specified: RCW 41.34.100.